src/morphology/stems/sme-abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! =============================================
!! !!!File containing North Saami abbreviations 
! =============================================

!! !!Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 4 + 1 groups, because of the preprocessor
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation !!= * __@CODE@__
ITRAB ;	  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (intransitive abbrs)
TRNUMAB ; !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numberals)
TRAB ;	  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (transitive abbrs)
NOAB ;	  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (not really abbrs)
NUMNOAB ; !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (not behaving as abbr before num)


!! !!The abbreviation lexicon itself
! ----------------------------------


! ==========================
! Intransitive abbreviations 
! ==========================

LEXICON NOAB !!= * __@CODE@__ du, gen, jur

!! This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive
!! abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
!! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
!! the sentnece (when next word has small letters) can be 
!! considered as true cases.

du+N+Sem/Cat:du ab-dot-noun-noab ; ! dualis
gen+N+Sem/Cat:gen ab-dot-noun-noab ; ! genitiivi
jur+A+Sem/Domain_Hum:jur ab-dot-adj-noab ; ! juridihkalaš



! ============================================================
! Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals 
! ============================================================

LEXICON NUMNOAB !!= * __@CODE@__ su, dii

!! This class contains homonyms, which are both abbrs for 
!! which numerals are complements and normal words. The abbreviation usage
!! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
!! the sentence can be considered as true cases.

dii+Adv+Sem/Time:dii ab-adv-numnoab ; ! diibmu, La stå!
su+Adv:su ab-dot-adv-numnoab ; ! La stå!
kl+Adv+Sem/Cat:kl ab-dot-adv-numnoab ;
